Washington statutes.
RCW 43.147.060

PNWER-Net working subgroup—Generally.

(1) The PNWER-Net working subgroup is hereby created for the member state of Washington. The working subgroup shall be composed of seven members as follows: Two members of the senate, one from each of the major caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate; two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; the state librarian; and the primary undergraduate academic librarian from each of the state's two research institutions of higher education.

(2) The staff support shall be provided by the senate committee services and, to the extent authorized by the chief clerk of the house of representatives, by the house of representatives office of program research as mutually agreed by the legislators on the working group.

(3) Legislative members shall be reimbursed for expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1993 c 485 s 3.]